Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB737.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204(a)(3) and (9) of the act of May 22, 1933 (P.L.853, No.155), known as The General County Assessment Law, are amended to read:Section 204. Exemptions from Taxation.--(a) The following property shall be exempt from all county, city, borough, town, township, road, poor and school tax, to wit:* * *(3) All hospitals, universities, colleges, seminaries, academies, associations and institutions of learning, 12345678910111213141516171819202122 benevolence, or charity, including fire and rescue stations, with the grounds thereto annexed and necessary for the occupancy and enjoyment of the same, founded, endowed, and maintained by public or private charity, except that there shall be no exemption for any portion of real property of an institution that is used for a commercial purpose or that is not actually and regularly used for the principal purposes of the institution: Provided, That the entire revenue derived by the same be applied to the support and to increase the efficiency and facilities thereof, the repair and the necessary increase of grounds and buildings thereof, and for no other purpose: And provided further, That any charitable organization providing residential housing services in which the charitable nonprofit organization receives subsidies for at least ninety-five per centum of the residential housing units from a low-income Federal housing program shall remain a "purely public charity" and tax exempt provided that any surplus from such assistance or subsidy is monitored by the appropriate governmental agency and used solely to advance common charitable purposes within the charitable organization;* * *(9) All real property owned by one or more institutions of purely public charity, used and occupied partly by such owner or owners and partly by other institutions of purely public charity, and necessary for the occupancy and enjoyment of such institutions so using it[;], except that there shall be no exemption for any portion of real property of the institution that is used for a commercial purpose or that is not actually and regularly used for the principal purposes of the institution;20250HB0737PN0761 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0737PN0761 - 3 - 12